Utah statutes.
53-3-419.   Nonresident driver violations reported to resident state.

(1)  When the division receives a report of the conviction or plea in abeyance of a nonresident holder of a CDL for a violation of a state law or local ordinance relating to traffic control, the division shall notify the driver licensing authority in the licensing state within 10 days of receipt of the report.

(2)  This section does not apply to parking violations.

